Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.290

Annual report and fee.

For so long as a commodity broker-dealer or commodity sales representative is licensed under this chapter, it shall file an annual report, together with the annual fee specified in RCW 21.30.240(2), with the administrator or the administrator's designee at a time and including that information that the administrator determines, by rule or order, is necessary or appropriate.

[ 1986 c 14 s 30.]